New York, session 2025-2026, S3394.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "ceasing 2 repeated and extremely egregious predatory (CREEP) behavior act". 3 § 2. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new arti- 4 cle 63-B to read as follows: 5 ARTICLE 63-B 6 ANTI-STALKING ORDERS 7 Section 6349. Definitions. 8 6350. Special proceeding for an anti-stalking order. 9 6351. Temporary anti-stalking order. 10 6352. Final anti-stalking order. 11 6353. Issuance of an anti-stalking order. 12 6354. Reconsideration and modification of an anti-stalking 13 order. 14 6355. Enforcement. 15 6356. Filing and enforcement of out-of-state orders. 16 6357. Virtual proceedings. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06824-06-5 S. 3394--A 2 1 § 6349. Definitions. For the purposes of this article: 2 1. "Anti-stalking order" shall mean an order of protection, either 3 temporary or final, that entitles the petitioner to certain protections 4 prescribed in sections sixty-three hundred fifty-one or sixty-three 5 hundred fifty-two of this article. An anti-stalking order shall be a 6 form of an order of protection and the terms "anti-stalking order" and 7 "order of protection" may be used interchangeably throughout this arti- 8 cle. 9 2. "Connected device" shall mean any device, or other physical object 10 that is capable of connecting to the internet, directly or indirectly, 11 and that is assigned an internet protocol address or bluetooth address. 12 3. "Course of conduct" shall mean two or more acts over a period of 13 time, however short, which evidence a continuity of purpose, with at 14 least one act occurring within the ninety days prior to the filing of a 15 petition under section sixty-three hundred fifty of this article. A 16 course of conduct shall not include conduct that was necessary to accom- 17 plish a legitimate purpose independent of making contact with the 18 targeted person. 19 4. "Stalking" and "stalked" shall mean when the respondent purposely 20 or knowingly engages in a course of conduct targeted at the petitioner 21 which would constitute stalking in the first degree, as described in 22 section 120.60 of the penal law, stalking in the second degree, as 23 described in section 120.55 of the penal law, stalking in the third 24 degree, as described in section 120.50 of the penal law, stalking in the 25 fourth degree, as described in section 120.45 of the penal law, menacing 26 in the second degree, as described in section 120.14 of the penal law, 27 menacing in the third degree, as described in section 120.15 of the 28 penal law, assault in the first degree, as described in section 120.10 29 of the penal law, assault in the second degree, as described in section 30 120.05 of the penal law, assault in the third degree, as described in 31 section 120.00 of the penal law, an attempted assault, harassment in the 32 first degree, as described in section 240.25 of the penal law, harass- 33 ment in the second degree, as described in section 240.26 of the penal 34 law, aggravated harassment in the first degree, as described in section 35 240.31 of the penal law, aggravated harassment in the second degree, as 36 described in section 240.30 of the penal law, unlawful dissemination or 37 publication of an intimate image, as described in section 245.15 of the 38 penal law, reckless endangerment in the first degree, as described in 39 section 120.25 of the penal law, reckless endangerment in the second 40 degree, as described in section 120.20 of the penal law, identity theft 41 in the first degree, as described in section 190.80 of the penal law, 42 identity theft in the second degree, as described in section 190.79 of 43 the penal law, identity theft in the third degree, as described in 44 section 190.78 of the penal law, coercion in the first degree, as 45 described in section 135.65 of the penal law, coercion in the second 46 degree, as described in section 135.61 of the penal law, and/or coercion 47 in the third degree, as described in section 135.60 of the penal law. 48 § 6350. Special proceeding for an anti-stalking order. 1. The supreme 49 court shall have jurisdiction over special proceedings under this arti- 50 cle. 51 2. A special proceeding under this article may be commenced in the 52 county in which the acts referred to in the petition allegedly occurred 53 or in which any party resides. If the petitioner fled their original 54 residence to avoid stalking, the special proceeding may be commenced in 55 the county of the petitioner's original residence or in the county of 56 their new residence. S. 3394--A 3 1 3. No anti-stalking order shall be issued between a petitioner and a 2 respondent who are members of the same family or household, as that term 3 is defined in subdivision one of section eight hundred twelve of the 4 family court act. 5 4. A petition filed under this article shall contain: 6 (a) an allegation that the respondent stalked the petitioner; 7 (b) the relationship of the respondent to the petitioner, if any; and 8 (c) a request for an order of protection. 9 § 6351. Temporary anti-stalking order. 1. Upon application of a peti- 10 tioner, and for good cause shown, the court may issue a temporary anti- 11 stalking order without notice to the respondent upon a finding that the 12 respondent likely poses an immediate threat to the safety or welfare of 13 the petitioner, a member of the petitioner's household, or a companion 14 animal, as that term is defined in subdivision five of section three 15 hundred fifty of the agriculture and markets law, that is possessed, 16 kept, or held by the petitioner. 17 2. The court shall rule on the application for a temporary anti-stalk- 18 ing order in a written decision on the same day that the application is 19 filed or the next day that the court is open. 20 3. A temporary anti-stalking order issued pursuant to this section may 21 require that the respondent: 22 (a) cease all contact, by electronic means, telephone, mail, or any 23 other means, with the petitioner and/or another person; 24 (b) refrain from following, monitoring, or keeping the petitioner 25 under physical or electronic surveillance, or using telephonic, audi- 26 ovisual, or other electronic means to monitor the actions, location, or 27 communication of the petitioner and/or another person; 28 (c) refrain from remotely controlling any connected devices affecting 29 the home, vehicle, or property of the petitioner and/or another person; 30 (d) stay away from the home, school, business, motor vehicle, or place 31 of employment of the petitioner and/or any other person, or any other 32 specified location as designated by the court; and/or 33 (e) engage or cease engaging in any other behavior which the court 34 determines will meet the objective of protecting the petitioner, until 35 the date of the hearing on a final anti-stalking order. Such hearing 36 shall be scheduled as soon as practicable. Any requirements in a tempo- 37 rary anti-stalking order imposed on the respondent which involve a 38 person other than the petitioner may only be made if and to the extent 39 that such requirements further the purpose of protecting the petitioner. 40 § 6352. Final anti-stalking order. 1. If the court, after notice to 41 the respondent and a hearing, finds that the allegations of the petition 42 are supported by a fair preponderance of the evidence, the court may 43 issue a final anti-stalking order. A final anti-stalking order may 44 require that the respondent: 45 (a) cease all contact, by electronic means, telephone, mail, or any 46 other means, with the petitioner and/or another person; 47 (b) refrain from following, monitoring, or keeping the petitioner 48 under physical or electronic surveillance, or using telephonic, audi- 49 ovisual, or other electronic means to monitor the actions, location, or 50 communication of the petitioner and/or another person; 51 (c) refrain from remotely controlling any connected devices affecting 52 the home, vehicle, or property of the petitioner and/or another person; 53 (d) stay away from the home, school, business, motor vehicle, or place 54 of employment of the petitioner and/or any other person, or any other 55 specified location as designated by the court; S. 3394--A 4 1 (e) pay the reasonable counsel fees and disbursement involved in 2 obtaining or enforcing the anti-stalking order which the petitioner has 3 sought; and/or 4 (f) engage or cease engaging in any other behavior which the court 5 determines will meet the objective of protecting the petitioner, for a 6 period of time not in excess of five years. The duration of any tempo- 7 rary anti-stalking order shall not by itself be a factor in determining 8 the length or issuance of any final anti-stalking order. Any require- 9 ments in a final anti-stalking order imposed on the respondent which 10 involve a person other than the petitioner may only be made if and to 11 the extent that such requirements further the purpose of protecting the 12 petitioner. The court may, upon motion, extend the order of protection 13 for a reasonable period of time upon a showing of good cause or consent 14 of the parties. 15 § 6353. Issuance of an anti-stalking order. 1. An anti-stalking order 16 issued pursuant to this article shall bear in a conspicuous manner the 17 term "order of protection" or "temporary order of protection" as the 18 case may be and a copy shall be filed by the clerk of the court with the 19 sheriff's office in the county in which the petitioner resides, or, if 20 the petitioner resides within a city, with the police department of such 21 city. The anti-stalking order shall also contain the following notice: 22 "This order of protection will remain in effect even if the protected 23 party has, or consents to have, contact or communication with the party 24 against whom the order is issued. This order of protection can only be 25 modified or terminated by the court. The protected party cannot be held 26 to violate this order nor be arrested for violating this order.". The 27 absence of such language shall not affect the validity of such order. 28 Such anti-stalking order shall plainly state the date that such order 29 expires, if temporary, or, if the order is a final anti-stalking order 30 issued pursuant to section sixty-three hundred fifty-two of this arti- 31 cle, the length of such order. 32 2. The court shall notify the division of state police, any other law 33 enforcement agency with jurisdiction, and the statewide computerized 34 registry of orders of protection and warrants of arrest referred to in 35 section two hundred twenty-one-a of the executive law of the issuance of 36 an anti-stalking order and provide a copy of such order no later than 37 the next business day after issuing the order to such division and agen- 38 cy. The court also shall promptly notify such division and agency and 39 provide a copy of any order modifying or vacating such anti-stalking 40 order no later than the next business day after issuing the order. 41 3. The chief administrator of the courts shall promulgate appropriate 42 uniform temporary anti-stalking order forms, applicable to proceedings 43 under this article, to be used throughout the state. Such forms shall be 44 promulgated and developed in a manner to ensure the compatibility of 45 such forms with the statewide computerized registry established pursuant 46 to section two hundred twenty-one-a of the executive law. 47 § 6354. Reconsideration and modification of an anti-stalking order. 48 For good cause shown, the court may, after a hearing, reconsider and 49 modify any order issued under section sixty-three hundred fifty-three of 50 this article. 51 § 6355. Enforcement. 1. Any violations of an anti-stalking order 52 issued by a court under this article shall be subject to the penalties 53 of sections 120.14, 215.50, 215.51, and 215.52 of the penal law, as 54 prescribed by such sections. S. 3394--A 5 1 2. Any anti-stalking order issued under this article is a mandate of 2 the court for purposes of the offense of criminal contempt in subdivi- 3 sion three of section 215.50 of the penal law. 4 3. In any proceeding in which an anti-stalking order has been issued 5 under this article, the clerk of the court shall issue to the petitioner 6 and respondent and respondent's counsel and to any other person affected 7 by the order a copy of the anti-stalking order and ensure that a copy of 8 the anti-stalking order be transmitted, if applicable, to the local 9 correctional facility where the individual is or will be detained, the 10 state or local correctional facility where the individual is or will be 11 imprisoned, and the supervising probation department or department of 12 corrections and community supervision where the individual is under 13 probation or parole supervision. The presentation of a copy of such 14 order to any peace officer acting pursuant to their special duties or 15 police officer shall constitute authority for them to arrest a person 16 who has violated the terms of such order and bring such person before 17 the court and, otherwise, so far as lies within their power, to aid in 18 securing the protection such order was intended to afford. The protected 19 party in whose favor the anti-stalking order is issued may not be held 20 to violate an order issued in their favor, nor may such protected party 21 be arrested for violating such order. 22 § 6356. Filing and enforcement of out-of-state orders. 1. A valid 23 order of protection or temporary order of protection that is substan- 24 tially similar to the anti-stalking order described in this article 25 which is issued by court of competent jurisdiction in another state, 26 territorial, or tribal jurisdiction shall be accorded full faith and 27 credit and enforced as if it were issued by a court within the state for 28 as long as the order remains in effect in the issuing jurisdiction in 29 accordance with sections two thousand two hundred sixty-five and two 30 thousand two hundred sixty-six of title eighteen of the United States 31 Code. 32 2. An order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another 33 state, territorial, or tribal jurisdiction shall be deemed valid if: 34 (a) the issuing court had personal jurisdiction over the parties and 35 over the subject matter under the law of the issuing jurisdiction; and 36 (b) the person against whom the order was issued had reasonable notice 37 and an opportunity to be heard prior to issuance of the order; provided, 38 however, that if the order was a temporary order of protection issued in 39 the absence of such person, that notice had been given and that an 40 opportunity to be heard had been provided within a reasonable period of 41 time after the issuance of the order. 42 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of article fifty-four of this chap- 43 ter, an order of protection or temporary order of protection issued by a 44 court of competent jurisdiction in another state, territorial, or tribal 45 jurisdiction, accompanied by a sworn affidavit that upon information and 46 belief such order is in effect as written and has not been vacated or 47 modified, may be filed without fee with the clerk of the court. 48 § 6357. Virtual proceedings. Any supreme court conducting a proceeding 49 for a temporary or final anti-stalking order under this article may 50 conduct such proceedings virtually, provided that such proceeding is 51 conducted in a manner consistent with any rules and regulations for 52 virtual proceedings promulgated by the chief administrator of the courts 53 under section two hundred twelve of the judiciary law. 54 § 3. Paragraph 6 of subdivision (b) of section 8018 of the civil prac- 55 tice law and rules, as amended by chapter 428 of the laws of 2023, is 56 amended and a new paragraph 7 is added to read as follows: S. 3394--A 6 1 6. upon the filing of an application for an extreme risk protection 2 order pursuant to article [sixty-three-a] sixty-three-A of this chap- 3 ter[.]; or 4 7. upon the filing of a petition for an anti-stalking order pursuant 5 to article sixty-three-B of this chapter. 6 § 4. Section 120.14 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 222 of the 7 laws of 1994, subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 597 of the laws of 8 1998, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 120.14 Menacing in the second degree. 10 A person is guilty of menacing in the second degree when: 11 1. [He or she] such person intentionally places or attempts to place 12 another person in reasonable fear of physical injury, serious physical 13 injury or death by displaying a deadly weapon, dangerous instrument or 14 what appears to be a pistol, revolver, rifle, shotgun, machine gun or 15 other firearm; or 16 2. [He or she] Such person repeatedly follows a person or engages in a 17 course of conduct or repeatedly commits acts over a period of time 18 intentionally placing or attempting to place another person in reason- 19 able fear of physical injury, serious physical injury or death; or 20 3. [He or she] Such person commits the crime of menacing in the third 21 degree in violation of that part of a duly served order of protection, 22 or such order which the defendant has actual knowledge of because [he or 23 she] such defendant was present in court when such order was issued, 24 pursuant to article eight of the family court act, section 530.12 of the 25 criminal procedure law, article sixty-three-B of the civil practice law 26 and rules, or an order of protection issued by a court of competent 27 jurisdiction in another state, territorial or tribal jurisdiction, which 28 directed the respondent or defendant to stay away from the person or 29 persons on whose behalf the order was issued. 30 Menacing in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor. 31 § 5. Section 215.51 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 222 of the 32 laws of 1994, subdivision (b) as added by chapter 353 of the laws of 33 1996, the opening paragraph of subdivision (b) and subdivision (d) as 34 amended by chapter 597 of the laws of 1998, subdivision (c) as amended 35 by chapter 349 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 215.51 Criminal contempt in the first degree. 37 A person is guilty of criminal contempt in the first degree when: 38 (a) [he] such person contumaciously and unlawfully refuses to be sworn 39 as a witness before a grand jury, or, when after having been sworn as a 40 witness before a grand jury, [he] such person refuses to answer any 41 legal and proper interrogatory; or 42 (b) in violation of a duly served order of protection, or such order 43 of which the defendant has actual knowledge because [he or she] such 44 defendant was present in court when such order was issued, or an order 45 of protection issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in this or 46 another state, territorial or tribal jurisdiction, [he or she] such 47 defendant: 48 (i) intentionally places or attempts to place a person for whose 49 protection such order was issued in reasonable fear of physical injury, 50 serious physical injury or death by displaying a deadly weapon, danger- 51 ous instrument or what appears to be a pistol, revolver, rifle, shotgun, 52 machine gun or other firearm or by means of a threat or threats; or 53 (ii) intentionally places or attempts to place a person for whose 54 protection such order was issued in reasonable fear of physical injury, 55 serious physical injury, or death by repeatedly following such person or S. 3394--A 7 1 engaging in a course of conduct or repeatedly committing acts over a 2 period of time; or 3 (iii) intentionally places or attempts to place a person for whose 4 protection such order was issued in reasonable fear of physical injury, 5 serious physical injury, or death when [he or she] such defendant commu- 6 nicates or causes a communication to be initiated with such person by 7 mechanical or electronic means or otherwise, anonymously or otherwise, 8 by telephone, or by telegraph, mail, or any other form of written commu- 9 nication; or 10 (iv) with intent to harass, annoy, threaten or alarm a person for 11 whose protection such order was issued, repeatedly makes telephone calls 12 to such person, whether or not a conversation ensues, with no purpose of 13 legitimate communication; or 14 (v) with intent to harass, annoy, threaten or alarm a person for whose 15 protection such order was issued, strikes, shoves, kicks or otherwise 16 subjects such other person to physical contact or attempts or threatens 17 to do the same; or 18 (vi) by physical menace, intentionally places or attempts to place a 19 person for whose protection such order was issued in reasonable fear of 20 death, imminent serious physical injury, or physical injury. 21 (c) [he or she] such defendant commits the crime of criminal contempt 22 in the second degree as defined in subdivision three of section 215.50 23 of this article by violating that part of a duly served order of 24 protection, or such order of which the defendant has actual knowledge 25 because [he or she] such defendant was present in court when such order 26 was issued, under sections two hundred forty and two hundred fifty-two 27 of the domestic relations law, articles four, five, six and eight of the 28 family court act, [and] section 530.12 of the criminal procedure law, 29 and article sixty-three-B of the civil practice law and rules, or an 30 order of protection issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in 31 another state, territorial, or tribal jurisdiction, which requires the 32 respondent or defendant to stay away from the person or persons on whose 33 behalf the order was issued, and where the defendant has been previously 34 convicted of the crime of aggravated criminal contempt or criminal 35 contempt in the first or second degree for violating an order of 36 protection as described herein within the preceding five years; or 37 (d) in violation of a duly served order of protection, or such order 38 of which the defendant has actual knowledge because [he or she] such 39 defendant was present in court when such order was issued, or an order 40 issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in this or another state, 41 territorial or tribal jurisdiction, [he or she] such defendant inten- 42 tionally or recklessly damages the property of a person for whose 43 protection such order was issued in an amount exceeding two hundred 44 fifty dollars. 45 Criminal contempt in the first degree is a class E felony. 46 § 6. Subdivision 4 of section 140.10 of the criminal procedure law, as 47 added by chapter 222 of the laws of 1994, paragraph (a) as amended by 48 chapter 511 of the laws of 1996, paragraph (b) as amended by chapter 107 49 of the laws of 2004, paragraph (c) and the third undesignated paragraph 50 as amended by chapter 4 of the laws of 1997, the second undesignated 51 paragraph as added by chapter 480 of the laws of 2013, and the closing 52 paragraph as amended by chapter 224 of the laws of 1994, is amended to 53 read as follows: 54 4. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a police 55 officer shall arrest a person, and shall not attempt to reconcile the S. 3394--A 8 1 parties or mediate, where such officer has reasonable cause to believe 2 that: 3 (a) a felony, other than subdivision three, four, nine or ten of 4 section 155.30 of the penal law, has been committed by such person 5 against a member of the same family or household, as member of the same 6 family or household is defined in subdivision one of section 530.11 of 7 this chapter; or 8 (b) a duly served order of protection, anti-stalking order, or special 9 order of conditions issued pursuant to subparagraph (i) or (ii) of para- 10 graph (o) of subdivision one of section 330.20 of this chapter is in 11 effect, or an order of which the respondent or defendant has actual 12 knowledge because [he or she] the defendant was present in court when 13 such order was issued, where the order appears to have been issued by a 14 court of competent jurisdiction of this or another state, territorial or 15 tribal jurisdiction; and 16 (i) Such order directs that the respondent or defendant stay away from 17 persons on whose behalf the order of protection or special order of 18 conditions has been issued and the respondent or defendant committed an 19 act or acts in violation of such "stay away" provision of such order; or 20 (ii) The respondent or defendant commits a family offense as defined 21 in subdivision one of section eight hundred twelve of the family court 22 act or subdivision one of section 530.11 of this chapter in violation of 23 such order of protection or special order of conditions. 24 The provisions of this subdivision shall apply only to orders of 25 protection issued pursuant to sections two hundred forty and two hundred 26 fifty-two of the domestic relations law, articles four, five, six and 27 eight of the family court act and section 530.12 of this chapter, 28 special orders of conditions issued pursuant to subparagraph (i) or (ii) 29 of paragraph (o) of subdivision one of section 330.20 of this chapter 30 insofar as they involve a victim or victims of domestic violence as 31 defined by subdivision one of section four hundred fifty-nine-a of the 32 social services law or a designated witness or witnesses to such domes- 33 tic violence, anti-stalking orders issued pursuant to article sixty- 34 three-B of the civil practice law and rules, and to orders of protection 35 issued by courts of competent jurisdiction in another state, territorial 36 or tribal jurisdiction. In determining whether reasonable cause exists 37 to make an arrest for a violation of an order issued by a court of 38 another state, territorial or tribal jurisdiction, the officer shall 39 consider, among other factors, whether the order, if available, appears 40 to be valid on its face or whether a record of the order exists on the 41 statewide registry of orders of protection and warrants established 42 pursuant to section two hundred twenty-one-a of the executive law or the 43 protection order file maintained by the national crime information 44 center; provided, however, that entry of the order of protection or 45 special order of conditions into the statewide registry or the national 46 protection order file shall not be required for enforcement of the 47 order. When a special order of conditions is in effect and a defendant 48 or respondent has been taken into custody pursuant to this paragraph, 49 nothing contained in this paragraph shall restrict or impair a police 50 officer from acting pursuant to section 9.41 of the mental hygiene law; 51 or 52 (c) a misdemeanor constituting a family offense, as described in 53 subdivision one of section 530.11 of this chapter and section eight 54 hundred twelve of the family court act, has been committed by such 55 person against such family or household member, unless the victim 56 requests otherwise. The officer shall neither inquire as to whether the S. 3394--A 9 1 victim seeks an arrest of such person nor threaten the arrest of any 2 person for the purpose of discouraging requests for police intervention. 3 Notwithstanding the foregoing, when an officer has reasonable cause to 4 believe that more than one family or household member has committed such 5 a misdemeanor, the officer is not required to arrest each such person. 6 In such circumstances, the officer shall attempt to identify and arrest 7 the primary physical aggressor after considering: (i) the comparative 8 extent of any injuries inflicted by and between the parties; (ii) wheth- 9 er any such person is threatening or has threatened future harm against 10 another party or another family or household member; (iii) whether any 11 such person has a prior history of domestic violence that the officer 12 can reasonably ascertain; and (iv) whether any such person acted defen- 13 sively to protect [himself or herself] themself from injury. The officer 14 shall evaluate each complaint separately to determine who is the primary 15 physical aggressor and shall not base the decision to arrest or not to 16 arrest on the willingness of a person to testify or otherwise partic- 17 ipate in a judicial proceeding. 18 The protected party in whose favor the order of protection [or], 19 temporary order of protection, or anti-stalking order is issued may not 20 be held to violate an order issued in [his or her] their favor nor may 21 such protected party be arrested for violating such order. 22 Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be deemed to (a) require 23 the arrest of any person when the officer reasonably believes the 24 person's conduct is justifiable under article thirty-five of title C of 25 the penal law; or (b) restrict or impair the authority of any munici- 26 pality, political subdivision, or the division of state police from 27 promulgating rules, regulations and policies requiring the arrest of 28 persons in additional circumstances where domestic violence has alleged- 29 ly occurred. 30 No cause of action for damages shall arise in favor of any person by 31 reason of any arrest made by a police officer pursuant to this subdivi- 32 sion, except as provided in sections seventeen and eighteen of the 33 public officers law and sections fifty-k, fifty-l, fifty-m and fifty-n 34 of the general municipal law, as appropriate. 35 § 7. The opening paragraphs of paragraphs (t) and (t-1) of subdivision 36 2 of section 212 of the judiciary law, as added by section 2 of part BB 37 of chapter 55 of the laws of 2017, are amended to read as follows: 38 Make available translation services to all family and supreme courts 39 to assist in the translation of orders of protection and temporary 40 orders of protection, including a temporary or final anti-stalking order 41 issued pursuant to article sixty-three-B of the civil practice law and 42 rules, as provided in this paragraph, where the person protected by 43 and/or the person subject to the order of protection has limited English 44 proficiency or has a limited ability to read English: 45 Issue reports concerning the availability of translation services 46 where orders of protection and temporary orders of protection, including 47 a temporary or final anti-stalking order issued pursuant to article 48 sixty-three-B of the civil practice law and rules, are issued; special 49 pilot programs. 50 § 8. Subdivision 1 of section 221-a of the executive law, as amended 51 by chapter 427 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 52 1. The superintendent, in consultation with the division of criminal 53 justice services, office of court administration, and the office for the 54 prevention of domestic violence, shall develop a comprehensive plan for 55 the establishment and maintenance of a statewide computerized registry 56 of all orders of protection issued pursuant to articles four, five, six, S. 3394--A 10 1 eight and ten of the family court act, section 530.12 of the criminal 2 procedure law and, insofar as they involve victims of domestic violence 3 as defined by section four hundred fifty-nine-a of the social services 4 law, section 530.13 of the criminal procedure law and sections two 5 hundred forty and two hundred fifty-two of the domestic relations law, 6 extreme risk protection orders issued pursuant to article sixty-three-A 7 of the civil practice law and rules, anti-stalking orders issued pursu- 8 ant to article sixty-three-B of the civil practice law and rules, and 9 orders of protection issued by courts of competent jurisdiction in 10 another state, territorial or tribal jurisdiction, special orders of 11 conditions issued pursuant to subparagraph (i) or (ii) of paragraph (o) 12 of subdivision one of section 330.20 of the criminal procedure law inso- 13 far as they involve a victim or victims of domestic violence as defined 14 by subdivision one of section four hundred fifty-nine-a of the social 15 services law or a designated witness or witnesses to such domestic 16 violence, and all warrants issued pursuant to sections one hundred 17 fifty-three and eight hundred twenty-seven of the family court act, and 18 arrest and bench warrants as defined in subdivisions twenty-eight, twen- 19 ty-nine and thirty of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, inso- 20 far as such warrants pertain to orders of protection or temporary orders 21 of protection; provided, however, that warrants issued pursuant to 22 section one hundred fifty-three of the family court act pertaining to 23 articles three and seven of such act and section 530.13 of the criminal 24 procedure law shall not be included in the registry. The superintendent 25 shall establish and maintain such registry for the purposes of ascer- 26 taining the existence of orders of protection, temporary orders of 27 protection, warrants and special orders of conditions, and for enforcing 28 the provisions of paragraph (b) of subdivision four of section 140.10 of 29 the criminal procedure law. 30 § 9. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 31 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to 32 subdivision 4 of section 140.10 of the criminal procedure law made by 33 section six of this act shall not affect the repeal of such subdivision 34 and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith.